Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5201
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-5201 to 71-5209, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Residency program shall mean a residency education program which is approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education;

(2) Model ambulatory practice unit shall mean the facilities or classrooms for the teaching of ambulatory health care skills within a residency program;

(3) Medical profession shall mean medical physicians and osteopathic physicians; and

(4) College of Medicine shall mean the University of Nebraska College of Medicine.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 152, § 1.